Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1331
State highways; farm land; severed tracts; access.

Whenever the location, relocation, establishment, construction, or reconstruction of a highway causes the severance of real property, which is being used for farm or other agricultural purposes and title thereto is held under one owner, the department shall make provision for crossing the highway from one tract to the other, or compensation for the severance of the tract shall be paid; Provided, that should the tracts at any time cease to be held under one ownership, the right to such road crossing shall automatically terminate. No connecting road crossing shall be used for or in connection with the conduct of any roadside business or enterprise, but shall be available and used solely for passage from one of the severed tracts to the other.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 31, p. 431.